New York, session 2025-2026, S1823.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The parks, recreation and historic preservation law is 2 amended by adding a new section 13.08 to read as follows: 3 § 13.08 Requirement of solar panels on light fixtures. 1. Notwith- 4 standing any other provision of law, the office shall require solar 5 panels on any light fixtures installed on all lands, including state 6 parks and parkways, under the jurisdiction of the office. 7 2. The provisions of this section shall not apply to: 8 (a) Light fixtures that have a historic design that the office deter- 9 mines shall be unduly burdened by solar panels; and 10 (b) Light fixtures that the office determines don't receive adequate 11 sunlight, including but not limited to tunnels and underpasses. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05087-01-5